Vermont, session 2025-2026, H135.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Personal Income Tax * * *
VT LEG #379736 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.135
2025 Page 2 of 16
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5824 is amended to read:
§ 5824. ADOPTION OF FEDERAL INCOME TAX LAWS
The statutes of the United States relating to the federal income tax, as in
effect on December 31, 2023 2024, but without regard to federal income tax
rates under 26 U.S.C. § 1, are hereby adopted for the purpose of computing the
tax liability under this chapter and shall continue in effect as adopted until
amended, repealed, or replaced by act of the General Assembly.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 7402 is amended to read:
§ 7402. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter unless the context requires otherwise:
* * *
(8) “Laws of the United States” means the U.S. Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended through December 31, 2023 2024. As used in this
chapter, “Internal Revenue Code” has the same meaning as “laws of the United
States” as defined in this subdivision. The date through which amendments to
the U.S. Internal Revenue Code of 1986 are adopted under this subdivision
shall continue in effect until amended, repealed, or replaced by act of the
General Assembly.
* * *
VT LEG #379736 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.135
2025 Page 3 of 16
Sec. 3. 32 V.S.A. § 5861(c) is amended to read:
(c) Spouses or a surviving spouse may shall file a joint Vermont personal
income tax return for any taxable year for which the spouses file or the
surviving spouse are permitted to file files a joint federal income tax return
under the laws of the United States, unless the Commissioner allows a different
filing status.
Sec. 4. 32 V.S.A. § 5830f is amended to read:
§ 5830f. VERMONT CHILD TAX CREDIT
(a) A resident individual or part-year resident individual who is entitled to a
child tax credit under the laws of the United States or who would have been
entitled to a child tax credit under the laws of the United States but for the fact
that the individual or the individual’s spouse does not have a taxpayer
identification number shall be entitled to a refundable credit against the tax
imposed by section 5822 of this title for the taxable year. The total credit per
taxable year shall be in the amount of $1,000.00 per qualifying child, as
defined under 26 U.S.C. § 152(c) but notwithstanding the taxpayer
identification number requirements under 26 U.S.C. § 24(e) and (h)(7), who is
five six years of age or younger as of the close of the calendar year in which
the taxable year of the taxpayer begins. For a part-year resident individual, the
amount of the credit shall be multiplied by the percentage that the individual’s
VT LEG #379736 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.135
2025 Page 4 of 16
income that is earned or received during the period of the individual’s
residency in this State bears to the individual’s total income.
* * *
Sec. 5. 32 V.S.A. § 5828b is amended to read:
§ 5828b. EARNED INCOME TAX CREDIT
(a) A resident individual or part-year resident individual who is entitled to
an earned income tax credit granted under the laws of the United States or who
would have been entitled to an earned income tax credit under the laws of the
United States but for the fact that the individual, the individual’s spouse, or one
or more of the individual’s children does not have a qualifying taxpayer
identification number shall be entitled to a credit against the tax imposed for
each year by section 5822 of this title. The credit shall be for an individual
who claims one or more qualifying children 38 percent or for an individual
who does not claim one or more qualifying children 100 percent of the earned
income tax credit granted to the individual under the laws of the United States
or that would have been granted to the individual under the laws of the United
States but for the fact that the individual, the individual’s spouse, or one or
more of the individual’s children does not have a qualifying taxpayer
identification number, multiplied by the percentage that the individual’s
income that is earned or received during the period of the individual’s
residency in this State bears to the individual’s total income. A resident
VT LEG #379736 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.135
2025 Page 5 of 16
individual or part-year resident individual who would have been entitled to or
granted an earned income tax credit under the laws of the United States but for
the fact that the individual, the individual’s spouse, or one or more of the
individual’s children does not have a qualifying taxpayer identification number
shall be entitled to a credit under this section.
* * *
Sec. 6. 32 V.S.A. § 5811(21) is amended to read:
(21) “Taxable income” means, in the case of an individual, federal
adjusted gross income determined without regard to 26 U.S.C. § 168(k) and:
* * *
(B) decreased by the following items of income (to the extent such
income is included in federal adjusted gross income):
* * *
(v) the amount of any federal deduction or credit that the taxpayer
would have been allowed for the cultivation, testing, processing, or sale of
cannabis or cannabis products as authorized under 7 V.S.A. chapter 33 or 37,
but for 26 U.S.C. § 280E; and
* * *
(vii) U.S. military retirement income and U.S. military survivor
benefit income received by the surviving spouse or dependent of the deceased
service member; and
VT LEG #379736 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.135
2025 Page 6 of 16
* * *
Sec. 7. 32 V.S.A. § 5830e is amended to read:
§ 5830e. RETIREMENT INCOME; SOCIAL SECURITY INCOME
(a) Social Security income. The portion of federally taxable Social
Security benefits excluded from taxable income under subdivision
5811(21)(B)(iv) of this chapter shall be as follows:
(1) For taxpayers whose filing status is single, married filing separately,
head of household, or surviving spouse:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $50,000.00 $55,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under
the federal Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater than
$50,000.00 $55,000.00 but less than $60,000.00 $65,000.00, the percentage of
federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act to be
excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal adjusted
gross income over $50,000.00 $55,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $60,000.00 $65,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
VT LEG #379736 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.135
2025 Page 7 of 16
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this subdivision
(B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $60,000.00 $65,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this
section.
(2) For taxpayers whose filing status is married filing jointly:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $65,000.00 $70,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under
the Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater than
$65,000.00 $70,000.00 but less than $75,000.00 $80,000.00, the percentage of
federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act to be
excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal adjusted
gross income over $65,000.00 $70,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $75,000.00 $80,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this subdivision
(B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act.
VT LEG #379736 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.135
2025 Page 8 of 16
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $75,000.00 $80,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this
section.
(b) Civil Service Retirement System income. The portion of income
received from the Civil Service Retirement System excluded from taxable
income under subdivision 5811(21)(B)(iv) of this title shall be subject to the
limitations under subsection (e) of this section and shall be determined as
follows:
(1) For taxpayers whose filing status is single, married filing separately,
head of household, or surviving spouse:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $50,000.00 $55,000.00, the first $10,000.00 of income received from
the Civil Service Retirement System shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater than
$50,000.00 $55,000.00 but less than $60,000.00 $65,000.00, the percentage of
the first $10,000.00 of income received from the Civil Service Retirement
System to be excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s
federal adjusted gross income over $50,000.00 $55,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $60,000.00 $65,000.00;
VT LEG #379736 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.135
2025 Page 9 of 16
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this subdivision
(B) by the first $10,000.00 of income received from the Civil Service
Retirement System.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $60,000.00 $65,000.00, no amount of the income received from
the Civil Service Retirement System shall be excluded under this section.
(2) For taxpayers whose filing status is married filing jointly:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $65,000.00 $70,000.00, the first $10,000.00 of income received from
the Civil Service Retirement System shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater than
$65,000.00 $70,000.00 but less than $75,000.00 $80,000.00, the percentage of
the first $10,000.00 of income received from the Civil Service Retirement
System to be excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s
federal adjusted gross income over $65,000.00 $70,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $75,000.00 $80,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
VT LEG #379736 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.135
2025 Page 10 of 16
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this subdivision
(B) by the first $10,000.00 of income received from the Civil Service
Retirement System.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $75,000.00 $80,000.00, no amount of the income received from
the Civil Service Retirement System shall be excluded under this section.
(c) Other contributory retirement systems; earnings not covered by Social
Security. Other retirement income, except U.S. military retirement income
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, received by a taxpayer of this State
shall be excluded pursuant to subsection (b) of this section as though the
income were received from the Civil Service Retirement System and shall be
subject to the limitations under subsection (e)(d) of this section, provided that:
* * *
(d) U.S. military retirement income. U.S. military retirement income
received by a taxpayer of this State shall be excluded pursuant to subsection
(b) of this section as though the income were received from the Civil Service
Retirement System and shall be subject to the limitations under subsection (e)
of this section.
(e) Requirement to elect one exclusion. A taxpayer of this State who is
eligible during the taxable year for the Social Security income exclusion under
subsection (a) of this section and any one or both of the exclusions under
VT LEG #379736 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.135
2025 Page 11 of 16
subsections (b)–(d) and (c) of this section shall elect either one of the
exclusions for which the taxpayer is eligible under subsections (b)–(d) and (c)
of this section or the Social Security income exclusion under subsection (a) of
this section, but not both, for the taxable year. A taxpayer of this State who is
eligible during the taxable year for more than one of the both exclusions under
subsections (b)–(d) and (c) of this section shall elect only one of the exclusions
for which the taxpayer is eligible for the taxable year.
* * * Tobacco Products Tax * * *
Sec. 8. 32 V.S.A. § 7702 is amended to read:
§ 7702. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:
* * *
(15) “Other tobacco products” means any product manufactured from,
derived from, or containing tobacco or nicotine, whether natural or synthetic,
that is intended for human consumption by smoking, chewing, or in any other
manner, including products sold as a tobacco substitute, as defined in 7 V.S.A.
§ 1001(8), and including any liquids, whether nicotine based or not, or delivery
devices sold separately for use with a tobacco substitute, but shall not include
cigarettes, little cigars, roll-your-own tobacco, snuff, new smokeless tobacco as
defined in this section, or cannabis products as defined in 7 V.S.A. § 831.
* * *
VT LEG #379736 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.135
2025 Page 12 of 16
(20) “New smokeless tobacco” means any tobacco product
manufactured from, derived from, or containing tobacco or nicotine, whether
natural or synthetic, that is not intended to be smoked, has a moisture content
of less than 45 percent, or is offered in individual single-dose tablets or other
discrete single-use units.
* * *
* * * Pay for Property Valuation Hearing Officers * * *
Sec. 9. 32 V.S.A. § 4465 is amended to read:
§ 4465. APPOINTMENT OF PROPERTY VALUATION HEARING
OFFICER; OATH; PAY
When an appeal to the Director is not withdrawn or forwarded by the
Director to Superior Court pursuant to subsection 4461(a) of this title, the
Director shall refer the appeal in writing to a person not employed by the
Director, appointed by the Director as hearing officer. The Director shall have
the right to remove a hearing officer for inefficiency, malfeasance in office, or
other cause. In like manner, the Director shall appoint a hearing officer to fill
any vacancy created by resignation, removal, or other cause. Before entering
into their duties, persons appointed as hearing officers shall take and subscribe
the oath of the office prescribed in the Constitution, which oath shall be filed
with the Director. The Director Commissioner of Taxes shall pay each hearing
officer a sum not to exceed $150.00 per diem for each day wherein hearings
VT LEG #379736 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.135
2025 Page 13 of 16
are held $38.00 per hour plus a cost-of-living adjustment in an amount equal to
any adjustment approved for exempt employees by the Secretary of
Administration, together with reasonable expenses as the Director
Commissioner may determine. A hearing officer may subpoena witnesses,
records, and documents in the manner provided by law for serving subpoenas
in civil actions and may administer oaths to witnesses.
* * * Flooding Abatement Program * * *
Sec. 10. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 82, Sec. 1, as amended by 2024 Acts and
Resolves No. 108, Sec. 3, is further amended to read:
Sec. 1. REIMBURSEMENT TO MUNICIPALITIES OF STATE
EDUCATION PROPERTY TAXES THAT WERE ABATED DUE
TO FLOODING
(a)(1) The Commissioner of Taxes may approve an application by a
municipality for reimbursement of State education property tax payments owed
under 32 V.S.A. § 5402(c) and 16 V.S.A. § 426. To be eligible for
reimbursement under this section, prior to November 15, 2024 2025, a
municipality must have abated, in proportion to the abated municipal tax,
under 24 V.S.A. § 1535 the State education property taxes that were assessed
on eligible property, after application of any property tax credit allowed under
32 V.S.A. chapter 154.
VT LEG #379736 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.135
2025 Page 14 of 16
(2) As used in this subsection, “eligible property” means property lost
or destroyed due directly or indirectly to severe storms and flooding in an area
that was declared a federal disaster between July 1, 2023 and October 15, 2023
December 31, 2024, provided the loss or destruction resulted in one or more of
the following:
(A) a 50 percent or greater loss in value to the primary structure on
the property;
(B) loss of use by the property owner of the primary structure on the
property for 60 days or more;
(C) loss of access by the property owner to utilities for the primary
structure on the property for 60 days or more; or
(D) condemnation of the primary structure on the property under
federal, State, or municipal law, as applicable.
(b) If a municipality demonstrates that, due to disruption to tax collections
resulting from flooding in an area that was declared a federal disaster between
July 1, 2023 and October 15, 2023 December 31, 2024, the municipality
incurred unanticipated interest expenses on funds borrowed to make State
education property tax payments owed under 32 V.S.A. § 5402(c) and 16
V.S.A. § 426, the municipality may be reimbursed by an amount equal to its
reasonable interest expenses under this subsection, provided the amount of
reimbursed interest expenses shall not exceed eight percent.
VT LEG #379736 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.135
2025 Page 15 of 16
* * *
* * * Property Tax Credit Late Fee * * *
Sec. 11. 32 V.S.A. § 5402(c)(2) is amended to read:
(2) The Secretary of Education shall determine each municipality’s net
nonhomestead education tax payment and its net homestead education tax
payment to the State based on grand list information received by the Secretary
not later than the March 15 prior to the June 1 net payment. Payment shall be
accompanied by a return prescribed by the Secretary of Education. Each
municipality may retain 0.225 of one percent of the total education tax
collected, only upon timely remittance of net payment to the State Treasurer or
to the applicable school district or districts. Each municipality may also retain
$15.00 for each late property tax credit claim filed after April 15 and before
September 2, as notified by the Department of Taxes, for the cost of issuing a
new property tax bill.
* * * Downtown and Village Center Tax Credit * * *
Sec. 12. 32 V.S.A. § 5930ee is amended to read:
§ 5930ee. LIMITATIONS
Beginning in fiscal year 2010 and thereafter, the State Board may award tax
credits to all qualified applicants under this subchapter, provided that:
VT LEG #379736 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.135
2025 Page 16 of 16
(1) the total amount of tax credits awarded annually, together with sales
tax reallocated under section 9819 of this title, does not exceed $3,000,000.00
$5,000,000.00;
* * *
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 13. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on passage except:
(1) notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, Secs. 1 and 2 (annual conformity to
federal tax laws) shall take effect retroactively on January 1, 2025 and shall
apply to taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 2024;
(2) notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, Sec. 3 (personal income tax filings,
credits, and exemptions) shall take effect retroactively on January 1, 2025 and
shall apply to taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 2025;
(3) Sec. 9 (pay for property valuation hearing officers) shall take effect
on July 1, 2025; and
(4) notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, Sec. 10 (flooding abatement
reimbursement program) shall take effect retroactively on November 15, 2024.
VT LEG #379736 v.1